Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2376.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5518. Civil immigration arrests in houses of worship.(a) Offense defined.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority may not detain, arrest or otherwise take into custody a person located on the property of a house of worship on the basis of immigration enforcement.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply when a representative of Federal, State or local law enforcement is acting in the 1234567891011121314151617 representative's official capacity and possesses on the representative's person the judicial warrant that clearly demonstrates that the person to be detained, arrested or otherwise taken into custody is the subject of a judicial warrant.(b) Warrant disclosure.--If a representative of a Federal, State or local law enforcement authority effectuates an arrest on the basis of immigration enforcement on the property of a house of worship, the arresting representative shall be required to provide the necessary documentation under subsection (a) to any individual who requests to review the documentation.(c) Use of State appropriated money.--A representative of a State or local law enforcement authority may not use State-appropriated money or resources to conduct immigration enforcement.(d) Civil penalty.--A person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each offense. A penalty imposed under this section shall be paid to the Commonwealth.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"House of worship." A church, synagogue, mosque or other facility or place used for religious worship or other religious purpose."Immigration enforcement." An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal civil immigration law. The term includes an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's 20260HB2376PN3166 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) or 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens)."Judicial warrant." A written order that is signed by a judicial officer from a Federal Article III court or a State court of competent jurisdiction that directs a law enforcement agency or some other person who is specifically named in the order to arrest a person."Law enforcement authority." The term includes:(1) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) An individual employed in a position requiring certification in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 (relating to employees).(3) An officer or employee of any Federal agency.(4) Individuals acting on behalf of a Federal agency in an official capacity, temporarily or permanently in the service of the United States, whether with or without compensation.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2376PN3166 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021